Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 366.931 is amended to read:
366.931. (1) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Armed Forces of the United States” means:
[(a)] (A) The Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps and Coast Guard of the United States;
[(b)] (B) The reserves of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps and  Coast Guard of the
United States; and
[(c)] (C) The Oregon National Guard and a National Guard of any other state or territory.
(b) “Gold Star Family member” means a person who is a parent, sibling, spouse or  de-
pendent of a person who was killed in action during  an armed conflict while serving in the
Armed Forces of the United States.
(c) “Sibling” includes siblings of the whole or half blood  and siblings by adoption, mar-
riage or domestic partnership.
(2) To recognize and honor those who were killed in action or who died as a  result of wounds
received in action while serving in the Armed Forces of  the United States, the Department of
Transportation shall erect and maintain a Fallen Hero roadside memorial sign if:
(a)(A) The Legislative Assembly adopts  a concurrent resolution that recognizes the individual
killed in the line of duty; or
(B) The individual killed in the line  of duty was formerly designated as either a prisoner of war
or unaccounted for by the Defense POW/MIA Accounting Agency and  the remains of the individual
have been recovered, identified and returned to Oregon; and
(b) The department receives the payment of a  fee determined by the department under sub-
section (3) of this section.
(3) The department shall determine the amount of  the fee required under subsection (2)(b) of this
section by rule. The fee may not exceed the direct and indirect expenses associated with erecting,
maintaining and removing a roadside memorial sign.
(4) The department shall deposit the fees that the department collects under  this section into
the Roadside Memorial Fund established under ORS 366.932.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section,  a public body,  as defined in ORS
174.109, may not expend moneys for the purpose of paying the fee required under this section.
Enrolled House Bill 3001 (HB 3001-A) Page 1
(6) The department shall waive the fee required  under this section and expend moneys
for the purpose of paying the fee required under this section if:
(a) A request to waive the fee is submitted by a Gold Star Family member; and
(b) Funds are appropriated by the  Legislative Assembly or otherwise made available to
the department for the purpose of paying the fees.
[(6)] (7) The department, by rule, shall establish the size,  design and location of a roadside me-
morial sign erected under this section. The sign must include the name of  the individual the sign is
recognizing.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 805.105 is amended to read:
805.105. (1) The  Department of Transportation shall establish a veterans’ recognition registra-
tion plate program to issue registration plates called “veterans’ recognition registration  plates”
upon request to an owner of any motor vehicle registered  under ORS 803.420 (6)(a) if the owner of
the motor vehicle qualifies for the plates. Rules adopted under this section shall  include, but need
not be limited to, rules that:
(a) Describe general qualifications to be met by any veterans’ group in order  to be eligible for
a veterans’ recognition registration plate issued under this section.
(b) Specify circumstances under which the department may cease to issue veterans’  recognition
registration  plates.
(c) Specify what constitutes proof of veteran status for  issuance of a veterans’ recognition reg-
istration plate, if such proof is required by a  veterans’ group or by the Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(d) Specify what constitutes proof that a person is a surviving family member of a person who
was killed in action during  an armed conflict while serving in the Armed Forces of the United
States. The department may only issue a veterans’  recognition registration plate displaying a gold
star decal and the words “Gold Star Family” to a person who is a parent, sibling, spouse  or de-
pendent of a person who was killed in  action during an armed conflict while serving in the Armed
Forces of the United States.
(2)(a) In addition to any other fee authorized by  law, upon issuance of a veterans’ recognition
registration plate under this section  and upon renewal of registration for a vehicle that has plates
issued under this section, the department shall collect  a surcharge of $2.50 per plate for each year
of the registration period for the vehicle as described under ORS 803.415.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of  this subsection, net proceeds of the sur-
charge collected by the department for the veterans’  recognition registration plate shall be depos-
ited in the trust fund established under ORS 406.050 for paying the expenses of operating the Oregon
Veterans’ Homes identified in ORS 408.362.
(c) If the department issues a veterans’ recognition registration plate  that names, describes or
represents a veterans’ group, that veterans’ group may designate an account  into which the net
proceeds of the surcharge collected by the department under this section are to  be deposited. The
department shall keep accurate records  of the number of plates issued under this paragraph for each
veterans’ group and, after payment  of administrative expenses of the department, shall deposit
moneys collected under this subsection into the specified account.
(d) The department shall waive the surcharge required under paragraph (a) of  this sub-
section and transfer the amount otherwise paid by the person to the trust fund  established
under ORS 406.050 if:
(A) A request to waive the surcharge is submitted by a Gold Star Family member; and
(B) Funds are appropriated by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise made available to
the department for the purpose of paying the surcharge.
[(d)] (e)  Deposits under this subsection shall be made quarterly.
(3)(a) In  consultation with the Department of Transportation, the Director of Veterans’ Affairs
shall design the veterans’ recognition registration plate.
(b) If the department issues  a veterans’ recognition registration plate to recognize a veterans’
group, the department shall, in consultation with the requesting veterans’ group, add words or a
Enrolled House Bill 3001 (HB 3001-A) Page 2
military-related decal  to the veterans’ recognition registration plate that names, describes or re-
presents the veterans’ group.
(c) The department shall add a gold star  decal and the words “Gold Star Family” to a veterans’
recognition  registration  plate background to recognize surviving family members of persons killed
in action during an armed conflict while serving in the Armed Forces of the United States.
(d) Except as otherwise required by the design,  veterans’ recognition registration plates must
comply with the requirements of ORS 803.535.
(4) The department shall determine how many sets of veterans’ recognition  registration plates
will be manufactured. If the department  does not sell or issue renewal for 500 sets of veterans’ re-
cognition registration plates in  any one year, the department shall cease production of veterans’
recognition registration plates. For the purposes of this section, veterans’ recognition registration
plates that name, describe or represent a veterans’ group are included in the total number  of
veterans’ recognition registration plates issued.
(5) For the purposes of  this section, “sibling” includes siblings of the whole or half blood and
siblings by adoption, marriage or domestic partnership.
SECTION 3.
(1) The amendments to ORS 366.931  by section 1 of this 2023 Act apply to
applications received on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 805.105 by section 2 of this 2023 Act apply to plates  issued,
renewed or replaced on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3),  chapter , Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House
Bill 5040), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  federal
funds received as reimbursement from the United States  Department of Transportation, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2  (3), chapter ,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill 5040), collected or received by the Department of
Transportation, for project delivery and support, is increased by $20,000.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5),  chapter , Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House
Bill 5040), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  federal
funds received as reimbursement from the United States  Department of Transportation, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2  (5), chapter ,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill 5040), collected or received by the Department of
Transportation, for driver and motor vehicle services, is increased by $5,000.
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled House Bill 3001 (HB 3001-A) Page 3
Passed by House June 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3001 (HB 3001-A) Page 4